Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 3

Interstate Nurse Licensure Compact [Repealed]

63-7-301. [Repealed.]

Acts 2002, ch. 538, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch 591, § 2, effective January 19, 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-7-301–63-7-304 concerned Interstate Nurse Licensure Compact.

Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 3 provided that the state board of nursing is directed to inform the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission by letter of the effective dates for the new compact enacted by this act and the withdrawal from the old compact codified in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 7, Part 3. The state board of nursing informed the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission that the effective date for the new compact and withdrawal from the old compact is January 19, 2018. See Chapter 7, Part 4 of this title for the new compact.

63-7-302. [Repealed.]

Acts 2002, ch. 538, § 2; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 2, effective January 19, 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-7-301–63-7-304 concerned Interstate Nurse Licensure Compact.

Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 3 provided that the state board of nursing is directed to inform the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission by letter of the effective dates for the new compact enacted by this act and the withdrawal from the old compact codified in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 7, Part 3. The state board of nursing informed the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission that the effective date for the new compact and withdrawal from the old compact is January 19, 2018. See Chapter 7, Part 4 of this title for the new compact.

63-7-303. [Repealed.]

Acts 2002, ch. 538, § 3; repealed by Acts 2016, ch 591, § 2, effective January 19, 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-7-301–63-7-304 concerned Interstate Nurse Licensure Compact.

Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 3 provided that the state board of nursing is directed to inform the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission by letter of the effective dates for the new compact enacted by this act and the withdrawal from the old compact codified in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 7, Part 3. The state board of nursing informed the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission that the effective date for the new compact and withdrawal from the old compact is January 19, 2018. See Chapter 7, Part 4 of this title for the new compact.

63-7-304. [Repealed.]

Acts 2002, ch. 538, § 4; repealed by Acts 2016, ch 591, § 2, effective January 19, 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-7-301–63-7-304 concerned Interstate Nurse Licensure Compact.

Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 3 provided that the state board of nursing is directed to inform the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission by letter of the effective dates for the new compact enacted by this act and the withdrawal from the old compact codified in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 7, Part 3. The state board of nursing informed the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission that the effective date for the new compact and withdrawal from the old compact is January 19, 2018. See Chapter 7, Part 4 of this title for the new compact.